Maryland, session 2026, HB0739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1005.
(a) In this section, “clean claim” means a claim for reimbursement, as defined in
regulations adopted by the Commissioner under § 15–1003 of this subtitle.
(b) To the extent consistent with the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974 (ERISA), 29 U.S.C. 1001 et seq., this section applies to an insurer, nonprofit health
service plan, or health maintenance organization that acts as a third party administrator.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0739*

HOUSE BILL 739
(c) Except as provided in § 15–1315 of this title and subsection [(i)] (J) of this
section, within 30 days after receipt of a claim for reimbursement from a person entitled to
reimbursement under § 15–701(a) of this title or from a hospital or related institution, as
those terms are defined in § 19–301 of the Health – General Article, an insurer, nonprofit
health service plan, or health maintenance organization shall:
(1) mail or otherwise transmit payment for the claim in accordance with
this section; or
(2) [send] MAIL OR E–MAIL a notice of receipt and status of the claim that
states:
(i) that the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health
maintenance organization refuses to reimburse all or part of the claim and the reason for
the refusal;
(ii) that, in accordance with § 15–1003(d)(1)(ii) of this subtitle, the
legitimacy of the claim or the appropriate amount of reimbursement is in dispute and
additional information is necessary to determine if all or part of the claim will be
reimbursed and what specific additional information is necessary; or
(iii) that the claim is not clean and the specific additional information
necessary for the claim to be considered a clean claim.
(D) A REFUSAL TO REIMBURSE ALL OR PART OF A CLAIM FOR
REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE
CONSIDERED A DENIAL OF ALL OR PART OF THE CLAIM.
[(d)] (E) (1) (i) In this subsection, “credit card” means a credit, debit,
prepaid, or stored–value card used to make a payment through a private card network.
(ii) “Credit card” includes a method of payment to a provider where
no physical card is presented.
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization may pay a claim under subsection (c) of this section, or a portion of a claim
under subsection [(f)] (G) of this section, using a credit card or an electronic funds transfer
payment method that imposes on the provider a fee or similar charge to process the
payment if:
(i) the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization notifies the provider in advance of the payment that:
1. a fee or similar charge associated with the use of the credit
card or electronic funds transfer payment method will apply; and

HOUSE BILL 739 3
2. the provider will need to consult the provider’s merchant
processor or financial institution for the specific rates;
(ii) the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization offers the provider an alternative payment method that does not impose a fee
or similar charge on the provider; and
(iii) the provider or the provider’s designee elects to accept payment
of the claim or a portion of the claim using the credit card or electronic funds transfer
payment method.
(3) If a provider participates on a provider panel of an insurer, a nonprofit
health service plan, or a health maintenance organization, the acceptance by the provider
or the provider’s designee of a payment method offered under paragraph (2)(ii) of this
subsection or elected under paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection shall apply to all claims
paid for by the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance organization
unless otherwise notified by the provider or the provider’s designee.
[(e)] (F) (1) An insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization shall permit a provider a minimum of 180 days from the date a covered service
is rendered to submit a claim for reimbursement for the service.
(2) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization wholly or partially denies a claim for reimbursement, the insurer, nonprofit
health service plan, or health maintenance organization shall permit a provider a minimum
of 90 working days after the date of denial of the claim to appeal the denial.
(3) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization erroneously denies a provider’s claim for reimbursement submitted within the
time period specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection because of a claims processing
error, and the provider notifies the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health
maintenance organization of the potential error within 1 year of the claim denial, the
insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance organization, on discovery of
the error, shall reprocess the provider’s claim without the necessity for the provider to
resubmit the claim, and without regard to timely submission deadlines.
[(f)] (G) (1) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health
maintenance organization provides notice under subsection (c)(2)(i) of this section, the
insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance organization shall mail or
otherwise transmit payment for any undisputed portion of the claim within 30 days of
receipt of the claim, in accordance with this section.
(2) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization provides notice under subsection (c)(2)(ii) of this section, the insurer, nonprofit
health service plan, or health maintenance organization shall:

HOUSE BILL 739
(i) 1. mail or otherwise transmit payment for any undisputed
portion of the claim in accordance with this section; and
[(ii)] 2. comply with subsection (c)(1) or (2)(i) of this section within
30 days after receipt of the requested additional information; OR
(II) IF THE PROVIDER DOES NOT SEND THE REQUESTED
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION WITHIN 30 DAYS, COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (C)(1) OR
(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization provides notice under subsection (c)(2)(iii) of this section, the insurer,
nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance organization shall:
(I) comply with subsection (c)(1) or (2)(i) of this section within 30
days after receipt of the requested additional information; OR
(II) IF THE PROVIDER DOES NOT SEND THE REQUESTED
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION WITHIN 30 DAYS, COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (C)(1) OR
(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
[(g)] (H) (1) If an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health
maintenance organization fails to pay a clean claim for reimbursement or otherwise
violates any provision of this section, the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health
maintenance organization shall pay interest on the amount of the claim that remains
unpaid 30 days after receipt of the initial clean claim for reimbursement at the monthly
rate of:
(i) 1.5% from the 31st day through the 60th day;
(ii) 2% from the 61st day through the 120th day; and
(iii) 2.5% after the 120th day.
(2) The interest paid under this subsection shall be included in any late
reimbursement without the necessity for the person that filed the original claim to make
an additional claim for that interest.
[(h)] (I) An insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization that violates a provision of this section is subject to:
(1) a fine not exceeding $500 for each violation that is arbitrary and
capricious, based on all available information; and
(2) the penalties prescribed under § 4–113(d) of this article for violations
committed with a frequency that indicates a general business practice.

HOUSE BILL 739 5
[(i)] (J) (1) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health
maintenance organization may suspend review of a claim for reimbursement for a
preauthorized or approved health care service if the insurer, nonprofit health service plan,
or health maintenance organization sends written notice within 30 days after receipt of the
claim that informs the person filing the claim, that:
(i) review of the claim is suspended during the second or third
month of a grace period under 45 C.F.R. § 156.270(d); and
(ii) on receipt of the payment of premium, the insurer, nonprofit
health service plan, or health maintenance organization is required to comply with
paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) Within 30 days after receipt of the payment of premium, an insurer, a
nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance organization shall comply with
subsection (c)(1) or (2) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.